North Carolina, session 2025, HB201.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. A motor vehicle combination consisting of a trailer in excess of 30 feet
or a motor vehicle and trailer combination in excess of 48 total feet may not be operated on the
following designated route:
(1) The portion of U.S. Route 25/70 beginning in Madison County at the
intersection of N.C. Highway 213 and continuing northerly until the
intersection of U.S. Route 25/70 and N.C. Highway 208.
(2) The portion of U.S. Route 25/70 beginning at the intersection of N.C.
Highway 208 and continuing westerly to the Tennessee state line.
SECTION 2. The penalties for a violation of Section 1 of this act shall be the same
as those set forth in subsections (h) and (i) of G.S. 20-115.1.
SECTION 3. This act applies only to Madison County.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H201-v-1*